Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
323C

PRIVACY OF
HEALTH CARE INFORMATION

REPEALED. L 2001, c 244, §§1 to 6.

Note

This chapter, enacted by L 1999, c 87 and amended by L 2000,
c 91, §2, c 127, §3 and c 140, and made effective July 1, 2001 by L Sp 2000 2d,
c 1 was repealed by L 2001, c 244 on June 30, 2001.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next